Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 2. Creation of Districts.

§ 33.2-1903.
Procedure for creation of districts.

Any two or more counties or cities may, in conformance with the procedure set forth in this section, or as otherwise may be provided by law, constitute a transportation district and shall have and exercise the powers set forth in this section and such additional powers as may be granted by the General Assembly. A transportation district may be created by ordinance adopted by the governing body of each participating county and city, which ordinances shall (i) set forth the name of the proposed transportation district, which shall include the words “transit district” or “transportation district,” (ii) fix the boundaries thereof, (iii) name the counties and cities that are in whole or in part to be embraced therein, and (iv) contain a finding that the orderly growth and development of the county or city and the comfort, convenience, and safety of its citizens require an improved transportation system, composed of transit facilities, public highways, and other modes of transport, and that joint action through a transportation district by the counties and cities that are to compose the proposed transportation district will facilitate the planning and development of the needed transportation system. Such ordinances shall be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth and, upon certification by that officer to the Tax Commissioner and the governing body of each of the participating counties and cities that the ordinances required by this chapter have been filed and, upon the basis of the facts set forth therein, satisfy such requirements, the territory defined in such ordinances, upon the entry of such certification in the minutes of the proceedings of the governing body of each of the counties and cities, shall be and constitute a transportation district for all of the purposes of this chapter, known and designated by the name stated in the ordinances.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any county or city may, subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter, constitute itself a transportation district in the event that no governing body of any contiguous county or city wishes to combine for such purpose, provided that the governing body of such single locality transportation district shall comply with the provisions of subsection A by adopting an ordinance that (i) sets forth the name of the proposed transportation district, which shall include the words “transit district” or “transportation district”; (ii) fixes, in such county or city, the boundaries thereof; (iii) names the county or city that is in whole or in part to be embraced therein; and (iv) contains a finding that the orderly growth and development of the county or city and the comfort, convenience, and safety of its citizens require an improved transportation district, composed of transit facilities, public highways, and other modes of transport, and that joint action with contiguous counties and cities has not been agreed to at this time, but that the formation of a transportation district will facilitate the planning and development of the needed transportation system, and shall file such ordinance in the manner and mode required by subsection A. At such time as the governing body of any contiguous county or city desires to combine with the original locality for the formation of an enlarged transportation district, it shall enter into an agreement with the commission of the original transportation district on such terms and conditions, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, as may be agreed upon by such commission and such additional county or city, and in conformance with the following procedures. The governing body of the county or city having jurisdiction over the territory to be added to the original transportation district shall adopt an ordinance specifying the area to be enlarged, containing the finding specified in clause (iv) of subsection A, and a statement that a contract or agreement between the county or city and the commission specifying the terms and conditions of admittance to the transportation district has been executed. The ordinance, to which shall be attached a certified copy of such contract, shall be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth and, upon certification by that officer to the Tax Commissioner, the commission, and the governing body of each of the component counties and cities that the ordinance required by this section has been filed, and that the terms thereof conform to the requirements of this section, such additional county, or part thereof, or city, upon the entry of such certification in the minutes of the proceedings of the governing body of such county or city, shall become a component government of the transportation district and the county, or portion thereof specified, or city shall be embraced by the transportation district.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1345; 1966, c. 419; 1972, c. 832; 1973, c. 324; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4504; 2006, c. 354; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A regional planning district commission

is not a locality, authority, or sanitation district for purposes of competitive negotiation as defined in §

2.2-4301

of the Virginia Public Procurement Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert D. “Bobby” Orrock, Member, House of Delegates, 10-020,
(4/27/10) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1904.
Northern Virginia Transportation District and Commission.

There is hereby created the Northern Virginia Transportation District (the District), comprising the Counties of Arlington, Fairfax, and Loudoun; the Cities of Alexandria, Falls Church, and Fairfax; and such other county or city contiguous to the District that agrees to join the District.

There is hereby established the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission (the Commission) as a transportation commission pursuant to this chapter. The Commission shall consist of five nonlegislative citizen members from Fairfax County, three nonlegislative citizen members from Arlington County, two nonlegislative citizen members from Loudoun County, two nonlegislative citizen members from the City of Alexandria, one nonlegislative member from the City of Falls Church, one nonlegislative citizen member from the City of Fairfax, and the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee to serve ex officio with voting privileges. If a county or city contiguous to the District agrees to join the District, such locality shall appoint one nonlegislative citizen member to the Commission. Members from the counties and cities shall be appointed from their respective governing bodies. The Commission shall also include four members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates who may be members of the House of Delegates and two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. All legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Members may be reappointed for successive terms. All members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. Except for the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee, all members of the Commission shall be residents of the localities composing the District. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

History.

2004, c. 1000, § 15.1-4503.1; 2014, c. 805; 2016, cc. 117, 374; 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 117 and 374 are identical, and substituted “two nonlegislative citizen members from Loudoun County” for “one nonlegislative citizen member from Loudoun County” in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective July 1, 2018, in subsection B, in the fifth sentence, deleted “of the House of Delegates” following “four member” and substituted “who may be members of the House of Delegates” for “for terms coincident with their terms of office” and substituted “All legislative members shall serve” for “for” at the beginning of the sixth sentence.